Nebraska, session 109, LB229.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 48-604, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-604 As used in the Employment Security Law, unless the context
otherwise requires, employment shall mean:
(1) Any service performed, including service in interstate commerce, for
wages under a contract of hire, written or oral, express or implied;
(2) The term employment shall include an individual's entire service,
performed within or both within and without this state if (a) the service is
localized in this state, (b) the service is not localized in any state but some
of the service is performed in this state and the base of operations or, if
there is no base of operations, then the place from which such service is
directed or controlled is in this state or the base of operations or place from
which such service is directed or controlled is not in any state in which some
part of the service is performed but the individual's residence is in this
state, (c) the service shall be deemed to be localized within a state if (i)
the service is performed entirely within such state or (ii) the service is
performed both within and without such state, but the service performed without
such state is incidental to the individual's service within the state, for
example, is temporary or transitory in nature or consists of isolated
transactions;
(3) Services performed outside the state and services performed outside
the United States as follows:
(a) Services not covered under subdivision (2) of this section and
performed entirely without this state, with respect to no part of which
contributions are required under an unemployment compensation law of any other
state or of the federal government, shall be deemed to be employment subject to
the Employment Security Law if the commissioner approves the election of the
employer, for whom such services are performed, that the entire service of such
individual shall be deemed to be employment subject to such law;
(b) Services of an individual wherever performed within the United States
or Canada if (i) such service is not covered under the employment compensation
law of any other state or Canada and (ii) the place from which the service is
directed or controlled is in this state; and
(c)(i) Services of an individual who is a citizen of the United States,
performed outside the United States except in Canada in the employ of an
American employer, other than service which is deemed employment under
subdivisions (2) and (3)(a) and (b) of this section or the parallel provisions
of another state's law, if:
(A) The employer's principal place of business in the United States is
located in this state;
(B) The employer has no place of business in the United States, but the
employer is an individual who is a resident of this state; the employer is a
corporation or limited liability company which is organized under the laws of
this state; or the employer is a partnership or a trust and the number of the
partners or trustees who are residents of this state is greater than the number
who are residents of any other state; or
(C) None of the criteria of subdivisions (A) and (B) of this subdivision
are met, but the employer has elected coverage in this state or, the employer
having failed to elect coverage in any state, the individual has filed a claim
for benefits based on such service under the laws of this state.
(ii) American employer, for the purposes of this subdivision, shall mean:
(A) An individual who is a resident of the United States; (B) a partnership if
two-thirds or more of the partners are residents of the United States; (C) a
trust if all the trustees are residents of the United States; or (D) a
corporation or limited liability company organized under the laws of the United
States or of any state.
(iii) The term United States for the purpose of this section includes the
states, the District of Columbia, the Virgin Islands, and the Commonwealth of
Puerto Rico;
(4)(a) Service performed in the employ of this state or any political
subdivision thereof or any instrumentality of any one or more of the foregoing
or any instrumentality which is wholly owned by this state and one or more
other states or political subdivisions, or any service performed in the employ
of any instrumentality of this state or of any political subdivision thereof
and one or more other states or political subdivisions if such service is
excluded from employment as defined in the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as
-1-

LB229 LB229
2025 2025
amended, solely by reason of 26 U.S.C. 3306(c)(7), and is not otherwise
excluded under this section;
(b) Service performed by an individual in the employ of a religious,
charitable, educational, or other organization, but only if the following
conditions are met: (i) The service is excluded from employment as defined in
the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, solely by reason of 26 U.S.C.
3306(c)(8), and is not otherwise excluded under this section; and (ii) the
organization had four or more individuals in employment for some portion of a
day in each of twenty different weeks, whether or not such weeks were
consecutive, within either the current or preceding calendar year, regardless
of whether they were employed at the same moment of time;
(c)(i) Service performed by an individual in agricultural labor if such
service is performed for a person who during any calendar quarter in either the
current or preceding calendar year paid remuneration in cash of twenty thousand
dollars or more to individuals employed in agricultural labor, or for some
portion of a day in each of twenty different calendar weeks, whether or not
such weeks were consecutive, in either the current or the preceding calendar
year, employed in agricultural labor ten or more individuals, regardless of
whether they were employed at the same moment of time.
(ii) For purposes of this subdivision:
(A) Any individual who is a member of a crew furnished by a crew leader to
perform services in agricultural labor for any other person shall be treated as
an employee of such crew leader if such crew leader holds a valid certificate
of registration under the Migrant and Seasonal Agricultural Worker Protection
Act, as amended, 29 U.S.C. 1801 et seq.; substantially all the members of such
crew operate or maintain tractors, mechanized harvesting or cropdusting
equipment, or any other mechanized equipment, which is provided by such crew
leader; and such individual is not an employee of such other person within the
meaning of any other provisions of this section; and
(B) In case any individual who is furnished by a crew leader to perform
service in agricultural labor for any other person and who is not treated as an
employee of such crew leader under subdivision (A) of this subdivision, such
other person and not the crew leader shall be treated as the employer of such
individual and such other person shall be treated as having paid cash
remuneration to such individual in an amount equal to the amount of cash
remuneration paid to such individual by the crew leader, either on his or her
own behalf or on behalf of such other person, for the service in agricultural
labor performed for such other person; and
(d) Service performed by an individual in domestic service in a private
home, local college club, or local chapter of a college fraternity or sorority
if performed for a person who paid cash remuneration of one thousand dollars or
more in the current calendar year or the preceding calendar year to individuals
employed in such domestic service in any calendar quarter;
(5) Services performed by an individual for wages, including wages
received under a contract of hire, shall be deemed to be employment unless it
is shown to the satisfaction of the commissioner that (a) such individual has
been and will continue to be free from control or direction over the
performance of such services, both under his or her contract of service and in
fact, (b) such service is either outside the usual course of the business for
which such service is performed or such service is performed outside of all the
places of business of the enterprise for which such service is performed, and
(c) such individual is customarily engaged in an independently established
trade, occupation, profession, or business. The provisions of this subdivision
are not intended to be a codification of the common law and shall be considered
complete as written;
(6) The term employment shall not include:
(a) Agricultural labor, except as provided in subdivision (4)(c) of this
section;
(b) Domestic service, except as provided in subdivision (4)(d) of this
section, in a private home, local college club, or local chapter of a college
fraternity or sorority;
(c) Service not in the course of the employer's trade or business
performed in any calendar quarter by an employee, unless the cash remuneration
paid for such service is fifty dollars or more and such service is performed by
an individual who is regularly employed by such employer to perform such
service and, for the purposes of this subdivision, an individual shall be
deemed to be regularly employed by an employer during a calendar quarter only
if (i) on each of some twenty-four days during such quarter such individual
performs for such employer for some portion of the day service not in the
course of the employer's trade or business, or (ii) such individual was
regularly employed, as determined under subdivision (c)(i) of this subdivision,
by such employer in the performance of such service during the preceding
calendar quarter;
(d) Service performed by an individual in the employ of his or her son,
daughter, or spouse and service performed by a child under the age of twenty-
one in the employ of his or her father or mother;
(e) Service performed in the employ of the United States Government or an
instrumentality of the United States immune under the Constitution of the
United States from the contributions imposed by sections 48-648 and 48-649 to
48-649.04, except that, to the extent that the Congress of the United States
shall permit states to require any instrumentalities of the United States to
make payments into an unemployment fund under a state unemployment compensation
act, all of the Employment Security Law shall be applicable to such
-2-

LB229 LB229
2025 2025
instrumentalities and to services performed for such instrumentalities in the
same manner, to the same extent, and on the same terms as to all other
employers, individuals, and services, except that if this state is not
certified for any year by the Secretary of Labor of the United States under
section 3304 of the Internal Revenue Code as defined in section 49-801.01, the
payments required of such instrumentalities with respect to such year shall be
refunded by the commissioner from the fund in the same manner and within the
same period as is provided in section 48-660, with respect to contributions
erroneously collected;
(f) Service performed in the employ of this state or any political
subdivision thereof or any instrumentality of any one or more of the foregoing
if such services are performed by an individual in the exercise of his or her
duties: (i) As an elected official; (ii) as a member of the legislative body or
a member of the judiciary of a state or political subdivision thereof; (iii) as
a member of the Army National Guard or Air National Guard; (iv) as an employee
serving on a temporary basis in case of fire, storm, snow, earthquake, flood,
or similar emergency; or (v) as an election official or election worker if the
amount of remuneration received by the individual during the calendar year for
services as an election official or election worker is less than one thousand
dollars;
(g) For the purposes of subdivisions (4)(a) and (4)(b) of this section,
service performed:
(i) In the employ of (A) a church or convention or association of churches
or (B) an organization which is operated primarily for religious purposes and
which is operated, supervised, controlled, or principally supported by a church
or convention or association of churches;
(ii) By a duly ordained, commissioned, or licensed minister of a church in
the exercise of his or her ministry or by a member of a religious order in the
exercise of the duties required by such order;
(iii) In a facility conducted for the purpose of carrying out a program of
rehabilitation for an individual whose earning capacity is impaired by age or
physical or mental deficiency or injury, or providing remunerative work for the
individuals who because of their impaired physical or mental capacity cannot be
readily absorbed in the competitive labor market, by an individual receiving
such rehabilitation or remunerative work;
(iv) As part of an unemployment work relief or work-training program
assisted or financed in whole or in part by any federal agency or an agency of
a state or political subdivision thereof, by an individual receiving such work
relief or work training; or
(v) By an inmate of a custodial or penal institution;
(h) Service with respect to which unemployment compensation is payable
under an unemployment compensation system established by an act of Congress;
(i) Service performed in any calendar quarter in the employ of any
organization exempt from income tax under section 501(a) of the Internal
Revenue Code as defined in section 49-801.01, other than an organization
described in section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code as defined in section
49-801.01, or under section 521 thereof, if the remuneration for such service
is less than fifty dollars;
(j) Service performed in the employ of a school, college, or university,
if such service is performed (i) by a student who is enrolled, regularly
attending classes at, and working for such school, college, or university
pursuant to a financial assistance arrangement with such school, college, or
university or (ii) by the spouse of such student, if such spouse is advised, at
the time such spouse commences to perform such service, that (A) the employment
of such spouse to perform such service is provided under a program to provide
financial assistance to such student by such school, college, or university and
(B) such employment will not be covered by any program of unemployment
insurance;
(k) Service performed as a student nurse in the employ of a hospital or
nurses training school by an individual who is enrolled and is regularly
attending classes in a nurses training school chartered or approved pursuant to
state law; and service performed as an intern in the employ of a hospital by an
individual who has completed a four-year course in a medical school chartered
or approved pursuant to state law;
(l) Service performed by an individual as a real estate salesperson, as an
insurance agent, or as an insurance solicitor, if all such service performed by
such individual is performed for remuneration solely by way of commission;
(m) Service performed by an individual under the age of eighteen in the
delivery or distribution of newspapers or shopping news, not including delivery
or distribution to any point for subsequent delivery or distribution;
(n) Service performed by an individual in the sale, delivery, or
distribution of newspapers or magazines under a written contract in which (i)
the individual acknowledges that the individual performing the service and the
service are not covered and (ii) the newspapers and magazines are sold by him
or her at a fixed price with his or her compensation being based on the
retention of the excess of such price over the amount at which the newspapers
or magazines are charged to him or her, whether or not he or she is guaranteed
a minimum amount of compensation for such service, or is entitled to be
credited with the unsold newspapers or magazines turned back;
(o) Service performed by an individual who is enrolled at a nonprofit or
public educational institution which normally maintains a regular faculty and
curriculum and normally has a regularly organized body of students in
attendance at the place where its educational activities are carried on, as a
-3-

LB229 LB229
2025 2025
student in a full-time program, taken for credit at such institution, which
combines academic instruction with work experience, if such service is an
integral part of such program, and such institution has so certified to the
employer, except that this subdivision shall not apply to service performed in
a program established for or on behalf of an employer or a group of employers;
(p) Service performed in the employ of a hospital, if such service is
performed by a patient of the hospital;
(q) Service performed for a motor carrier, as defined in 49 U.S.C. 13102
or section 75-302, as amended, by a lessor leasing one or more motor vehicles
driven by the lessor or one or more drivers provided by the lessor under a
lease, with the motor carrier as lessee, executed pursuant to 49 C.F.R. part
376, Title 291, Chapter 3, as amended, of the rules and regulations of the
Public Service Commission, or the rules and regulations of the Division of
Motor Carrier Services. This shall not preclude the determination of an
employment relationship between the lessor and any personnel provided by the
lessor in the conduct of the service performed for the lessee;
(r) Service performed by an individual for a business engaged in
compilation of marketing databases if such service consists only of the
processing of data and is performed in the residence of the individual;
(s) Service performed by an individual as a volunteer research subject who
is paid on a per study basis for scientific, medical, or drug-related testing
for any organization other than one described in section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code as defined in section 49-801.01 or any governmental
entity;
(t) Service performed by a direct seller if:
(i) Such person is engaged in sales primarily in person and is:
(A) Engaged in the trade or business of selling or soliciting the sale of
consumer products or services to any buyer on a buy-sell basis or a deposit-
commission basis for resale, by the buyer or any other person, in the home or
otherwise than in a permanent retail establishment;
(B) Engaged in the trade or business of selling or soliciting the sale of
consumer products or services in the home or otherwise than in a permanent
retail establishment; or
(C) Engaged in the trade or business of the delivering or distribution of
newspapers or shopping news, including any services directly related to such
trade or business;
(ii) Substantially all the remuneration, whether or not paid in cash, for
the performance of the services described in subdivision (t)(i) of this
subdivision is directly related to sales or other output, including the
performance of services, rather than to the number of hours worked; and
(iii) The services performed by the person are performed pursuant to a
written contract between such person and the person for whom the services are
performed and the contract provides that the person will not be treated as an
employee for federal and state tax purposes. Sales by a person whose business
is conducted primarily by telephone or any other form of electronic sales or
solicitation is not service performed by a direct seller under this
subdivision;
(u) Service performed by an individual who is a participant in the
National and Community Service State Grant Program, also known as AmeriCorps,
because a participant is not considered an employee of the organization
receiving assistance under the national service laws through which the
participant is engaging in service pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 12511(30)(B); and
(v) Service performed at a penal or custodial institution by a person
committed to a penal or custodial institution; and
(w)(i) Service by a marketplace network contractor if:
(A) The marketplace network contractor and marketplace network platform
agree in writing that the marketplace network contractor is an independent
contractor and not an employee of the marketplace network platform;
(B) The marketplace network platform does not unilaterally prescribe
specific hours during which the marketplace network contractor must be
available to accept service requests submitted through the marketplace network
platform's digital network;
(C) The marketplace network platform does not prohibit the marketplace
network contractor from engaging in outside employment or performing services
through other marketplace network platforms except while the marketplace
network contractor is performing services through the marketplace network
platform's digital network; and
(D) The marketplace network platform is not allowed to terminate the
contract of the marketplace network contractor for not accepting a specific
service request.
(ii) For purposes of subdivision (6)(w) of this section:
(A) Marketplace network contractor means a person to which all of the
following apply: Such person enters a written agreement with a marketplace
network platform to use the marketplace network platform's digital network to
connect with individuals or entities seeking services offered by the
marketplace network contractor; such person performs services for individuals
or entities through a marketplace network platform's digital network in
exchange for compensation or payment; and such person does not perform services
at a physical business location operated by the marketplace network platform in
this state; and
(B) Marketplace network platform means a person that maintains a digital
network to facilitate services by marketplace network contractors to
individuals or entities seeking those services, and accepts requests from the
-4-

LB229 LB229
2025 2025
public only through the platform's digital network or mobile application, and
not by telephone, facsimile, or in-person at a retail location.
(iii) Subdivision (6)(w) of this section shall not apply to services
performed by a marketplace network contractor:
(A) For any employer described in subdivision (4)(a) or (4)(b) of this
section or in section 48-603.01; or
(B) If with respect to such services a tax is required to be paid under
any federal law imposing a tax against which credit may be taken for
contributions required to be paid into a state unemployment compensation fund
or which as a condition for full tax credit against the tax imposed by the
Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, is required to be covered under the
Employment Security Law;
(7) If the services performed during one-half or more of any pay period by
an individual for the person employing him or her constitute employment, all
the services of such individual for such period shall be deemed to be
employment, but if the services performed during more than one-half of any such
pay period by an individual for the person employing him or her do not
constitute employment, then none of the services of such individual for such
period shall be deemed to be employment. As used in this subdivision, the term
pay period means a period, of not more than thirty-one consecutive days, for
which a payment of remuneration is ordinarily made to such individual by the
person employing him or her. This subdivision shall not be applicable with
respect to services performed in a pay period by an individual for the person
employing him or her when any of such service is excepted by subdivision (6)(h)
of this section; and
(8) Notwithstanding the foregoing exclusions from the definition of
employment, services shall be deemed to be in employment if with respect to
such services a tax is required to be paid under any federal law imposing a tax
against which credit may be taken for contributions required to be paid into a
state unemployment compensation fund or which as a condition for full tax
credit against the tax imposed by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended,
is required to be covered under the Employment Security Law.
Sec. 2. Original section 48-604, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
repealed.
-5-